Utah statutes.
58-67-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.
(1) (a)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in
accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by division rule.
(b)  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as
one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.
(2)  At the time of renewal, the licensee shall show compliance with:
(a)  continuing education renewal requirements; and
(b)  the requirement for designation of a contact person and alternate contact
person for access to medical records and notice to patients as required by
Subsections 58-67-304(1)(b) and (c).
(3)  Each license issued under this chapter expires on the expiration date
shown on the license unless renewed in accordance with Section 58-1-308.
